Illinois, session 104th, HB5098.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Entertainment Water Access Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Entertainment" means all forms of entertainment, 8including, but not limited to, theatrical or operatic 9performances, concerts, motion pictures, entertainment at 10fairgrounds, amusement parks, athletic competitions and other 11sports, and all other forms of diversion, recreation, or show.12    "Place of entertainment" means an entertainment facility, 13including, but not limited to, an amphitheater, theater, 14stadium, arena, racetrack, museum, amusement park, venue, 15club, or other place where performances, concerts, exhibits, 16athletic games, contests, or other forms of entertainment are 17held. "Place of entertainment" does not include movie 18theaters. 19    Section 10. Available water requirement. While 20entertainment is occurring, a place of entertainment shall 21provide attendees with access to potable water by:22        (1) providing bottled water at no cost to the   HB5098- 2 -LRB104 17646 BDA 31077 b1    attendees;2        (2) allowing attendees to bring bottled water into the 3    place of entertainment; or4        (3) allowing attendees to bring an empty water bottle 5    to the place of entertainment and providing attendees with 6    free access to potable water to fill the bottle. 7    Section 15. Enforcement. The Attorney General shall 8enforce this Act. The Attorney General may provide information 9to owners and operators of places of entertainment regarding 10the requirements of this Act. The State's Attorney of the 11county where a violation occurred or will occur or the 12Attorney General may bring an action for injunctive relief to 13enjoin an actual or imminent violation of this Act. This 14Section shall not be construed to limit any relief at common 15law or under statute for any damages caused by a violation of 16this Act.